Utah statutes.
57-23-5.   License required.
Except as provided by Section 61-2-3, an individual may not offer, sell, or
otherwise dispose of a cooperative interest in this state unless he is
licensed by the division under Title 61, Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate,
as a principal real estate broker, associate real estate broker, or real
estate sales agent.
